Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5909
Grievance procedure.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Grievance means a written expression of dissatisfaction that may or may not be the result of an unresolved complaint; and

(b) Grievance procedure means the written policy of an assisted-living facility for addressing a grievance from an individual including an employee or resident.

(2) Each assisted-living facility shall, on or before January 1, 2020, provide to the department the grievance procedure provided to an applicant for admission to the assisted-living facility. When such grievance procedure is modified, updated, or otherwise changed, the new grievance procedure shall be provided to the department within seven business days after such new grievance procedure takes effect. The department shall make such grievance procedure available to the deputy public counsel for institutions.

Laws 2019, LB571, § 2.